el: Γεωργική πρακτική: Βιοδυναμική; Συμβατική; Θερμοκηπιακή; Υδροπονική; Ολοκληρωμένη διαχείριση παρασίτων; Βιολογική; Αναγεννητική; Άλλο
zh-CN: 养殖方式: 生物动力种植; 传统种植; 温室种植; 水培; 病虫害综合防治; 有机种植; 再生农业; 其他
ro-RO: Practică agricolă: Biodinamic; Convențional; Cultivat în seră; Hidroponic; Management integrat al dăunătorilor; Organic; Regenerativ; Altele
nb: Jordbrukspraksis: Biodynamisk; Konvensjonell; Dyrket i drivhus; Hydroponisk; Integrert skadedyrbekjempelse; Økologisk; Regenerativ; Annet
nl: Teeltmethode: Biologisch-dynamisch; Conventioneel; In een kas geteeld; Hydroponisch; Geïntegreerde gewasbescherming; Biologisch; Regeneratief; Overig
vi: Phương pháp canh tác: Nông nghiệp sinh thái; Truyền thống; Trồng trong nhà kính; Thủy canh; Quản lý dịch hại tổng hợp; Hữu cơ; Nông nghiệp tái sinh; Khác
pl: Praktyka rolnicza: Biodynamiczne; Konwencjonalne; Uprawa szklarniowa; Hydroponika; Zintegrowana ochrona przed szkodnikami; Ekologiczne; Regeneratywne; Inne
pt-PT: Prática agrícola: Biodinâmico; Convencional; Cultivado em estufa; Hidropónico; Gestão integrada de pragas; Biológico; Regenerativo; Outro
da: Landbrugspraksis: Biodynamisk; Konventionel; Drivhusdyrket; Hydroponisk; Integreret skadedyrsbekæmpelse; Økologisk; Regenerativ; Andet
ko: 사육 방식: 생명역동농법; 재래식; 온실 재배; 수경 재배; 종합 병해충 관리; 유기농; 재생농법; 기타
de: Landwirtschaftliche Praxis: Biodynamisch; Konventionell; Gewächshausanbau; Hydroponik; Integrierter Pflanzenschutz; Bio; Regenerativ; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Ūkininkavimo praktika: Biodinaminis; Tradicinis; Šiltnamiuose užauginta; Hidroponinis; Integruota kenkėjų kontrolė; Ekologiškas; Regeneracinis; Kita
en: Farming practice: Biodynamic; Conventional; Greenhouse grown; Hydroponic; Integrated pest management; Organic; Regenerative; Other
cs: Způsob pěstování: Biodynamické; Konvenční; Pěstováno ve skleníku; Hydroponické; Integrovaná ochrana proti škůdcům; Bio; Regenerativní; Jiné
fr: Pratique agricole: Biodynamique; Conventionnel; Cultivé en serre; Culture hydroponique; Lutte antiparasitaire intégrée; Biologique; Régénérateur; Autre
ja: 農業の実践: バイオダイナミック農法; 従来農法; 温室栽培; 水耕栽培; 総合的病害虫管理; オーガニック; リジェネラティブ; その他
hr-HR: Poljoprivredna praksa: Biodinamički; Konvencionalni; Uzgojeno u stakleniku; Hidroponski; Integrirano suzbijanje nametnika; Organski uzgoj; Regenerativni; Ostalo
ru: Практика выращивания: Биодинамическое; Традиционное; Тепличное выращивание; Гидропонное; Комплексная борьба с вредителями; Органическое; Регенеративное; Другое
tr: Tarım uygulamaları: Biyodinamik; Geleneksel; Sera yetiştiriciliği; Hidroponik; Entegre zararlı yönetimi; Organik; Yenileyici; Diğer
sl-SI: Kmetijska praksa: Biodinamično; Konvencionalno; Vzgojeno v rastlinjaku; Hidroponično; Integrirano zatiranje škodljivcev; Ekološko; Regenerativno; Drugo
es: Práctica agrícola: Biodinámica; Convencional; Cultivado en invernadero; Hidropónico; Manejo integrado de plagas; Orgánico; Regenerativa; Otra
fi: Maatalouskäytäntö: Biodynaaminen; Tavanomainen; Kasvihuoneessa kasvatettu; Vesiviljely; Integroitu torjunta; Luomu; Uudistava; Muu
sk-SK: Poľnohospodárska prax: Biodynamická; Konvenčná; Pestované v skleníku; Hydroponická; Integrovaná ochrana proti škodcom; Ekologická; Regeneratívna; Iná
th: แนวทางการทำเกษตรกรรม: ไบโอไดนามิก; แบบดั้งเดิม; ปลูกในเรือนกระจก; ไฮโดรโปนิกส์; การจัดการศัตรูพืชแบบผสมผสาน; ออร์แกนิก; เกษตรฟื้นฟู; อื่นๆ
hu: Gazdálkodási gyakorlat: Biodinamikus; Hagyományos; Üvegházi; Hidropóniás; Integrált növényvédelem; Organikus; Regeneratív; Egyéb
sv: Jordbrukspraxis: Biodynamisk; Konventionell; Växthusodlad; Hydroponisk; Integrerat växtskydd (IPM); Ekologisk; Regenerativ; Övrigt
pt-BR: Prática de cultivo: Biodinâmica; Convencional; Cultivado em estufa; Hidropônico; Manejo integrado de pragas; Orgânico; Regenerativa; Outros
it: pratica agricola: Biodinamica; Convenzionale; Coltivato in serra; Idroponica; Lotta integrata; Biologico; Rigenerativa; Altro
bg-BG: Земеделска практика: Биодинамично; Конвенционално; Отглеждано в оранжерия; Хидропонно; Интегрирано управление на вредителите; Органично; Регенеративно; Друго
zh-TW: 栽培方式: 生物動力農法; 慣行農法; 溫室栽培; 水耕; 病蟲害整合管理; 有機; 再生農法; 其他